Tennessee, session 114, SB2393.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 7-52-115(a), is amended by deleting
"A copy of the schedule of the current rates and charges in effect from time to time and a copy
of all rules and regulations of the supervisory body relating to electric service shall be kept on
public file at the main and all branch offices of the electric plant and also in the office of the
municipal clerk or recorder." and substituting:
A copy of the current schedule of rates and charges and all rules and regulations of the
supervisory body relating to electric service must be kept on public file at the main and
all branch offices of the electric plant, in the office of the municipal clerk or recorder, and
available to the public in an electronic format published online.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB2393
012611
- 1 -